Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-2312
Excise tax; not deducted from loan proceeds.

In the case of a pledge or mortgage of wheat as security for a loan under the federal price support program, no excise tax shall be deducted from the proceeds of such loan at the time the loan is made.

Laws 1955, c. 5, § 12, p. 63;

Laws 2022, LB805, § 5.
July 21, 2022